Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 216. Farmers’ Markets

§ 5001.
Definition.

In this chapter, “farmers’ market” shall mean an event or series of events at which two or more vendors of agricultural products, as defined in

11 V.S.A. § 991

, gather for purposes of offering for sale to the public their agricultural products.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 18, 2010.

§ 5002.
Vermont Farmers’ Market Association membership.

Farmers’ markets in this State that meet the minimum standards and best practices set forth in subsection (b) of this section may become members of the Vermont Farmers’ Market Association.

The Vermont Farmers’ Market Association shall:

develop minimum standards and best practices for the management and use of farmers’ markets in this State and shall submit them to the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets for recommendations;

extend memberships to farmers’ markets that meet the standards and best practices established under subdivision (1) of this subsection; and

prepare an annual report of its activities, including a financial statement, and make the report available to the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets and other interested parties no later than April 1 of each year.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 18, 2010.